Tennessee, session 114, HB1987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-6-202, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) A license or permit revoked or suspended pursuant to this section must be
reinstated within five (5) business days upon the wholesaler or retailer providing the
books, papers, and records for examination to the commissioner. The commissioner,
upon receipt of the documents, shall inform the alcoholic beverage commission.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1987
011904
- 1 -